Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 8 Personal Representative to Manage Assistance Payments

49-4-170.
Grounds for appointing personal representative; petition by county or district director.

When any otherwise qualified applicant for or recipient of assistance under this chapter or payee, in the case of temporary assistance for needy families, is or shall become unable to manage the assistance payments or otherwise fails so to manage, to the extent that deprivation or hazard to himself or others results, or when, in the case of temporary assistance for needy families, the payment is not being used for the benefit of the children, a petition may be filed by the county or district director of family and children services before the probate court of the county in which the applicant resides or the county in which the recipient receives his check, in the form of a verified written application for the appointment of a personal representative for the purpose of receiving and managing public assistance payments for any such recipient or payee, which application shall allege one or more of the above grounds for the legal appointment of such personal representative.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 200, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).

49-4-171.
Hearing on petition; appointment, duties, and removal of representative; court costs waived.

The court shall summarily order a hearing on the petition and shall cause the applicant or recipient to be served personally with a copy of the petition and order at least five days in advance of the time and place for the hearing. Findings of fact shall be made by the court without a jury; and if the court shall find that the applicant for or recipient of assistance under this chapter or the payee, in the case of temporary assistance for needy families, is unable to manage the assistance payments or otherwise fails so to manage to the extent that deprivation or hazard to himself or others results or, in the case of temporary assistance for needy families, the payment is not being used for the benefit of the children, the court may thereupon enter an order embracing such findings and appointing some responsible person as a personal representative of the applicant or recipient or of the payee, in the case of temporary assistance for needy families, for the purposes set forth in this article; provided, however, that no employee of the Department of Human Services shall be eligible to hold such appointment. The personal representative so appointed shall serve without bond and without compensation. He will be responsible for receiving the monthly assistance payment and using the proceeds of such payment for the benefit of the recipient of assistance under this chapter or, in the case of temporary assistance for needy families, for the application of the payment to the best interest of the children. Such personal representative shall be responsible to the court for the faithful discharge of the duties of his trust. The court may consider the recommendation of the county director of family and children services in the selection of a suitable person for appointment as personal representative for the limited purposes of this Code section. The personal representative so appointed may be removed by the court and the proceedings dismissed or another suitable personal representative appointed. All costs of court with respect to any such proceeding shall be waived.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 200, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).

49-4-172.
Appeal from order of appointment or removal.

Except as otherwise provided in Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15, from the order of the court appointing or removing such personal representative, an appeal may be had to the judge of the superior court, who shall hear the matter de novo without a jury.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 200, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 25, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 1986.

49-4-173.
Maintenance of records by county or district director; use of facts and findings in other proceedings.

The court may, for the purposes of this Code section, direct the county or district director of family and children services to maintain records pertaining to all aspects of any personal representative proceedings, which records the court may adopt as the court’s record and in lieu of maintenance of separate records by the court. The facts arrived at by the county or district director pursuant to this Code section and the findings of the court pursuant to this Code section shall not be competent as evidence in other proceedings dealing with any subject matter other than as provided in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 200, § 4.